Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201821-540
Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

The Nebraska Uniform Protected Series Act modifies, limits, or supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede section 101(c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. 7003(b).

Laws 2018, LB1121, § 41.
January 1, 2021